Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
26-1-111. Activities of the state department under the supervision of the executive director - cash fund - report - rules - statewide adoption resource registry.

The state department, under the supervision of the executive director, is charged with the administration or supervision of all the public assistance and welfare activities of the state, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, social services, child welfare services, rehabilitation, and programs for the aging and for veterans, which activities as enumerated are declared to be state as well as county purposes.

The state department, under the supervision of the executive director, shall:

Administer or supervise all forms of public assistance and welfare, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, and social services under programs for old age pensions except for the old age pension health and medical care program, and shall also administer and supervise the Colorado works program, aid to the blind, aid to the needy disabled, food stamps supplementation to households not receiving public assistance found eligible for food stamps under rules adopted by the state board, and such other public assistance and welfare activities as may be vested in the state department pursuant to law;

Administer or supervise the establishment, extension, and strengthening of child welfare services and other social services in cooperation with the federal department of health, education, and welfare and other state or federal agencies;

Administer the establishment, extension, and strengthening of rehabilitation programs and services, programs and services for the aging, and veterans' affairs activities in cooperation with the federal department of health, education, and welfare and other state or federal agencies;

Provide services to county governments including the organization and supervision of county departments for the effective administration of public assistance and welfare functions as set out in the rules of the executive director and the rules of the state board pursuant to section

26-1-107

as to program scope and content, including assistance payments, food stamps, and social services, and compilation of statistics and necessary information relative to assistance payments, food stamps, social services, child welfare services, including out-of-home placement services, rehabilitation, programs for the aging, and veterans' programs throughout the state, and obtaining federal reimbursement moneys available under the Title IV-E program created under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, based on out-of-home placements and alternative care treatment by county departments of children eligible for Title IV-E federal assistance, which moneys shall be allocated to counties to help defray the costs of performing its functions; except that nothing in this paragraph (d) shall be construed to allow counties to continue to receive an amount equal to the increased funding in the event the said funding is no longer available from the federal government.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1991, the state department shall pay to each county an amount equal to all federal revenues earned by the state pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, which exceed the amount necessary to fully fund program, training, and administrative costs that are reimbursed under Title IV-E for eligible services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1990, plus an amount necessary to fully fund the state foster care review program for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1991.

For each fiscal year after the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1991, the amount set aside from federal revenues earned by the state in accordance with sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) to fully fund Title IV-E eligible services and the costs of the administrative review unit shall be adjusted annually by the general assembly to reflect rate changes, workload, federal financial participation, and any other factor determined as necessary to maintain a comparable level of said services and costs as for the respective fiscal years described in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II).

For fiscal year 2003-04 and each fiscal year thereafter, after the amounts described in subsections (2)(d)(II)(A) and (2)(d)(II)(B) of this section are set aside, the total amount of money remaining shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the excess federal Title IV-E reimbursements cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this subsection (2)(d)(II)(C) as the "fund". The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for allocation to counties to help defray the costs of performing administrative functions related to obtaining federal reimbursement money available under the Title IV-E program. In addition, the general assembly may annually appropriate money in the fund to the department of early childhood for allocation to the counties for the provision of child care assistance, as described in section

26.5-4-105

, and to the state department for allocation to the counties for the provision of assistance, as defined in section

26-2-703 (2)

; social services, as defined in section

26-2-103

(11); and child welfare services, as defined in section

26-5-101 (3)

. For fiscal year 2004-05, and in subsequent years if so specified by the general assembly in the annual appropriations act, the counties shall expend the money allocated by the department of early childhood for the provision of child care assistance and by the state department for the provision of assistance, social services, and child welfare services pursuant to this subsection (2)(d)(II)(C) in a manner that will be applied toward the state's maintenance of historic effort as specified in section 409 (a)(7) of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended. Any money in the fund not expended for the purposes specified in this subsection (2)(d)(II)(C) may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and is not credited or transferred or revert to the general fund or another fund.

(C.5) and (D) Repealed.

(E) One hundred percent of the federal Title IV-E incentive funding received by the state for completion of timely interstate home studies shall be distributed to the county departments conducting the home studies. The Title IV-E incentives paid to the county departments pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (E) shall be divided and distributed according to the distribution formula set forth in rules to be promulgated by the state board no later than January 1, 2008. A county department receiving an incentive payment pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (E) shall expend those moneys for the provision of services allowed under Title IV-B and Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 955, § 1, effective May 21, 2004.)

Prescribe the form of blanks necessary for applications, reports, affidavits, and such other forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Designate child placement agencies licensed pursuant to part 9 of article 6 of this title 26 or county departments to act as agents of the state department for the purpose of authorizing child care placement as set forth in section

26-1-107 (6)(e)

and county departments to serve as agents of the state department in the performance of certain public assistance and welfare and related activities in the county;

Cooperate with other departments, agencies, and institutions of the state and federal governments in the performance of activities in conformity with the purposes of this title;

Act as the agent of the federal government in public assistance and welfare activities, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, social services, child welfare services, rehabilitation, and programs for the aging, in matters of mutual concern in conformity with this title and in the administration of any federal funds granted to the state to aid in the furtherance of any functions of the state department;

Administer such additional public assistance and welfare activities and functions as may be vested in it pursuant to law;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1111, § 24, effective July 1, 1994.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1220, § 4, effective July 1, 1997.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1111, § 24, effective July 1, 1994.)

Carry out the duties prescribed in article 11.7 of title 16, C.R.S.;

Promulgate rules in accordance with section

19-3-308 (1)

, C.R.S., for determining the risk of harm to a child who is the subject of a child abuse and neglect report setting forth the appropriate response by the county departments to such risks;

Adopt standards for conducting videotaped child abuse interviews in accordance with section

19-3-308.5 (3)

, C.R.S.;

Promulgate rules in accordance with section

19-3-211

, C.R.S., for establishing a conflict resolution process for resolving grievances against the county departments concerning responses to reports of child abuse and neglect and the performance of duties pursuant to article 3 of title 19, C.R.S. The rules must take into account and allow for any subsequent locally developed grievance procedures that apply to a locally restructured human services system to ensure consistency within the system.

Repealed.

Coordinate prevention and intervention programs, other than programs created in title 26.5, focused on positive youth development in accordance with state law and rules. The coordination must include the state youth development plan developed pursuant to section

26-1-111.3

that identifies key issues affecting youth to align strategic efforts and achieve positive outcomes for youth.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1111, § 24, effective July 1, 1994.)

The state department shall establish a statewide adoption resource registry which shall serve authorized or licensed child placement agencies, including, but not limited to, any agency, official, or court of the state or any of its political subdivisions authorized to place children and any other organizations or individuals whose purpose is to seek or assist in the adoptive placement of children who are listed or who may be listed in the adoption resource registry. As a means of recruiting adoptive families for children who have been legally freed for adoption by the termination of all parent-child legal relationships, including residual parental rights and responsibilities, and who are waiting for adoption in this state, such agencies and other organizations and individuals whose purpose is to seek or assist in the adoption of waiting children shall utilize any appropriate means to publicize the availability of such children. The statewide adoption resource registry shall include the age, sex, race or ethnic background of each child, a photograph of the child, and the child's social and medical history, psychological and emotional status, and known physical and mental impairments. It may also include any special services a child may need and physical descriptions, educational backgrounds, and known medical and emotional conditions of the child's parents and other relatives which may have developmental significance to the child. The statewide adoption resource registry shall be updated monthly.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1111, § 24, effective July 1, 1994.)

Unless otherwise exempted pursuant to rules adopted by the state board, each authorized or licensed child placement agency shall refer to the statewide adoption resource registry within ninety days of the termination of the parent-child legal relationship the name and a photograph and description of each child in its care, as required by regulations of the state board, who has been legally freed for adoption by the termination of the parent-child legal relationship and for whom no adoptive home has been found. The state board, in accordance with section

26-1-107 (6)(f)

, shall establish criteria by which an authorized or licensed child placement agency may determine that a child need not be listed with the registry. Such a child's name shall be forwarded to the state department by the authorized or licensed child placement agency, with reference to the specific reason for which the child was not placed with the registry. The state board shall establish procedures for periodic review of the status of such children in accordance with section

26-1-107 (6)(f)

. If the state department, in accordance with the criteria established by the state board, determines that adoption would be appropriate for a child not placed with the registry, the agency shall forthwith list the child. Each authorized or licensed child placement agency may voluntarily refer any child who has been legally freed for adoption.

Expenditures by a county department for the care and maintenance of a child who has not been referred to the statewide adoption resource registry in accordance with the requirements of this section shall not be subject to state reimbursement.

to (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1166, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-10.

L. 76:

(2)(j) added, p. 665, § 1, effective May 7.

L. 77:

(2)(f) amended and (2)(k) added, p. 1005, § 5, effective May 16; (2)(j) R&RE, p. 1325, § 1, effective July 1; (4) added, p. 1327, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1090, § 1, effective May 25; (1), (2)(a), (2)(d), and (2)(h) amended, p. 1081, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2)(l) added, p. 1238, § 2, effective July 1; (4)(c) amended, p. 2050, § 18, effective October 14.

L. 85:

(4)(a) amended, p. 935, § 1, effective April 24; (2)(l)(II) amended, p. 1063, § 2, effective May 22; (2)(j) amended, p. 1015, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2)(k) amended, p. 821, § 38, effective October 1.

L. 89:

(2)(l) amended, p. 1188, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(2)(m) added, p. 38, § 2, effective July 25.

L. 91:

(2)(d) amended, p. 1769, § 2, effective April 20; (2)(l) repealed and (2)(n) added, pp. 1860, 936, §§ 1, 5, effective July 1.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(2)(o) added, p. 80, § 1, effective October 16.

L. 92:

(2)(p) added, p. 462, § 8, effective June 2; (2)(j) amended, p. 1156, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2)(o)(II) repealed, p. 332, § 1, effective April 12; (2)(q) and (2)(r) added, p. 1170, § 3, effective June 3; (2)(d)(II)(C) amended, p. 1683, § 1, effective June 6; (1), IP(2), (2)(c), (2)(d)(I), (2)(h), (2)(j), (2)(k), (2)(n), (2)(o), (3), (4)(b), and (4)(c) amended and (5) and (6) added, p. 1111, § 24, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(2)(s) added, p. 2084, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 96:

(2)(f) amended, p. 1474, § 28, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(2)(a) and (2)(m) amended, p. 1220, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(2)(d)(III) added, p. 741, § 7, effective June 1; (7) added, p. 703, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2585, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2)(d) amended, p. 955, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2006:

(6) repealed, p. 1987, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(d)(II)(D) repealed, p. 757, § 8, effective May 10; (2)(d)(II)(E) added, p. 1020, § 11, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

(2)(d)(II)(C.5) added, (SB 09-264), ch. 204, p. 929, § 7, effective May 1.

L. 2011:

(5) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1169, § 70, effective August 10; (2)(a) amended, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 722, § 9, effective July 15, 2012.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1629, § 77, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(s) amended and (2)(u) added, (HB 13-1239), ch. 307, p. 1630, § 5, effective July 1; (2)(t) added, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 558, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2)(r) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 774, § 69, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(5) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1331, § 213, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(2)(d)(II)(C), (2)(f), and (2)(u) amended and (2)(t) repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 850, § 82, effective July 1; (5) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1518, § 81, effective July 1; (2)(u) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2981, § 66, effective August 10.

26-1-111.3. Activities of the state department under the supervision of the executive director - Colorado state youth development plan - creation - definitions.

Subject to available funding, the state department, in collaboration with the Tony Grampsas youth services board, created in section 26-6.8-103, shall convene a group of interested parties to create a Colorado state youth development plan. The goals of the plan are to identify key issues affecting youth and align strategic efforts to achieve positive outcomes for all youth.

The plan must:

Identify initiatives and strategies, organizations, and gaps in coverage that impact youth development outcomes;

Identify services, funding, and partnerships necessary to ensure that youth have the means and the social and emotional skills to successfully transition into adulthood;

Determine what is necessary in terms of community involvement and development to ensure youth succeed;

Develop an outline of youth service organizations based on, but not limited to, demographics, current services and capacity, and community involvement;

Identify successful youth development strategies nationally and in Colorado that could be replicated by community partners and entities across the state; and

Create a shared vision for how a strong youth development network would be shaped and measured.

The plan must include a baseline measurement of youth activities, developed using available data and resources. Data and resources may be collected from, but need not be limited to, the following:

An existing youth risk behavior surveillance system that monitors health-risk behaviors that contribute to the leading causes of death and disability among youth, including:

Behaviors that contribute to unintentional injuries and violence;

Sexual behaviors that contribute to unintended pregnancy and sexually transmitted infections, including HIV;

Alcohol and other drug use;

Tobacco use;

Unhealthy dietary behaviors; and

Inadequate physical activity;

The Colorado youth advisory council, created in section 2-2-1302, C.R.S.;

The state department of education;

The state department of higher education, to assess workforce readiness and student achievement as youth transition through the secondary and postsecondary education systems;

The state department of public health and environment;

The state department of health care policy and financing;

The state department of human services;

The state department of labor and employment;

The state department of public safety; and

The state judicial department.

The state department shall be responsible for any costs associated with the development of the plan and is not required to implement this section until adequate funding is secured.

The state department, in collaboration with the Tony Grampsas youth services board, created in section 26-6.8-103, shall complete the plan on or before September 30, 2014, and shall update the plan biennally thereafter.

Beginning in January 2015, and every January thereafter, the department shall report progress on the development and implementation of the plan as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203, C.R.S.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Entity" means any local government, state public or nonsectarian secondary school, charter school, group of public or nonsectarian secondary schools, school district or group of school districts, board of cooperative services, state institution of higher education, the Colorado National Guard, state agency, state-operated program, private nonprofit organization, or nonprofit community-based organization.

"Plan" means the Colorado state youth development plan created pursuant to this section.

"Youth" means an individual at least nine years of age and no more than twenty-one years of age.

"Youth service organization" means an entity that is community-based and:

Promotes innovative and evidence-based strategies for positive youth development and for reducing the occurrence and reoccurrence of child abuse and neglect;

Promotes innovative primary prevention and intervention services to youth and their families in an effort to decrease high-risk behavior, including but not limited to youth crime and violence; or

Promotes innovative strategies to at-risk students and their families in an effort to reduce the dropout rate in secondary schools.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1239), ch. 307, p. 1627, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 307, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

26-1-112. Locating violators - recoveries.

The executive director of the department of human services or district attorneys may request and shall receive from departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies of the state or any of its political subdivisions, and the same are authorized to provide, such assistance and data as will enable the state department of human services and county departments properly to carry out their powers and duties to locate and prosecute any person who has fraudulently obtained public assistance under this title. Any records established pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be available only to the state department of human services, the county departments, the attorney general, and the district attorneys, county attorneys, and courts having jurisdiction in fraud or recovery proceedings or actions.

All departments and agencies of the state and local governments shall cooperate in the location and prosecution of any person who has fraudulently obtained public assistance under this title, and, on request of the county board, the county director, the state department of human services, or the district attorney of any judicial district in this state, shall supply all information on hand relative to the location, employment, income, and property of such persons, notwithstanding any other provision of law making such information confidential, except the laws pertaining to confidentiality of any tax returns filed pursuant to law with the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall furnish at no cost to inquiring departments and agencies such information as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article. The procedures whereby this information will be requested and provided shall be established by rule of the state department. The state department or county departments shall use such information only for the purposes of administering public assistance under this title, and the district attorney shall use it only for the prosecution of persons who have fraudulently obtained public assistance under this title, and he shall not use the information, or disclose it, for any other purpose.

Whenever the state department of human services or a district attorney, for the state department, or the state department on behalf of a county department recovers any amount of fraudulently obtained public assistance funds, the federal government shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid unless a different amount is otherwise provided by federal law, the state shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of state funds paid and such additional amounts of federal funds recovered as provided by federal law, and the county department shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid unless a different amount is provided pursuant to federal law or this section.

Whenever a county department, a county board, a district attorney, or a state department on behalf of a county department recovers any amount of fraudulently obtained public assistance funds in the form of assistance payments, it shall be deposited in the county general fund and the federal government shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid unless a different amount is provided for by federal law, the state shall be entitled to a share proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid, and the county shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid and, in addition, a share proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid. In the case of funds recovered from fraudulently obtained food stamp coupons by the county department, the county board, the district attorney, or the state department on behalf of a county department, the county shall be entitled to the share of the recovered funds provided by the federal "Food Stamp Act".

Whenever the county department, the county board, the district attorney, or the state department on behalf of a county department pursuant to Public Law 96-58 recovers funds from food stamp coupons which were obtained through unintentional client error, the county shall be entitled to the share of the recovered funds provided by the federal "Food Stamp Act".

Whenever a county department, a county board, a district attorney, or the state department on behalf of the county recovers any amount of public assistance payments funds that were obtained through unintentional client error, the federal government shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid, unless a different amount is provided for by federal law, the state shall be entitled to a share proportionate to seventy-five percent of the amount of state funds paid, the county shall be entitled, except for the Colorado works program, to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid, if any, and, in addition, a share proportionate to twenty-five percent of the amount of state funds paid. In the Colorado works program, the county shall be entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid and, in addition, a share proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid.

Actual costs and expenses incurred by the district attorney's office in carrying out the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be billed to counties or a county within the judicial district in the proportions specified in section 20-1-302, C.R.S. Each county shall make an annual accounting to the state department on all amounts recovered.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1167, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-11.

L. 77:

(1) R&RE and (3)(c) amended, p. 1329, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1; (3)(a) and (3)(c) amended, p. 1331, § 1, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 639, § 4, effective June 7.

L. 81:

(2)(b) R&RE, p. 1367, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 937, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 89:

(1) and (2) amended and (3) and (4) added, p. 1193, § 2, effective June 7.

L. 91:

(2)(b)(II) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1860, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1), (2), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1142, § 81, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1221, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1988, § 13, effective July 1.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

(2) For the federal "Food Stamp Act", now known as the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008", see 7 U.S.C. sec. 2011 et seq. (Section 4001 of the "Food, Conservation, and Energy Act of 2008", Pub.L. 110-234, changed the name of the federal "Food Stamp Act of 1977" to the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008" and changed the name of the federal food stamp program to the "supplemental nutrition assistance program".)

26-1-112.5. Birth-related cost recovery program - cooperation with the department of health care policy and financing - duties of state department - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 1398, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective June 30, 1999. (See L. 95, p. 1398.)

26-1-113. Enforcement of support - RURESA. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1168, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-12.

L. 77:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1330, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 643, § 6, effective June 7.

26-1-114. Records confidential - authorization to obtain records of assets - release of location information to law enforcement agencies - outstanding felony arrest warrants.

The state department of human services may establish reasonable rules to provide safeguards restricting the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants, recipients, and former and potential recipients of federally aided public assistance and welfare, including but not limited to assistance payments, food stamps, social services, and child welfare services, to purposes directly connected with the administration of such public assistance and welfare and related state department activities and covering the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the state and county departments. Whenever, under provisions of law, names and addresses of applicants for, recipients of, or former and potential recipients of public assistance and welfare are furnished to or held by another agency, department of government, or an auditor conducting a financial or performance audit of a county department of human or social services pursuant to section 26-1-114.5, the agency, department, or auditor is required to prevent the publication of lists and their uses for purposes not directly connected with the administration of public assistance and welfare.

Repealed.

Except as provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (a), or except as disclosure is otherwise required by statute or by rule of civil procedure for child support establishment or enforcement purposes, it is unlawful for any person to solicit, disclose, or make use of or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any lists or names of or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving public assistance and welfare directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state or county departments or subdivisions or agencies thereof or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties. No financial institution or insurance company that provides the data, whether confidential or not, required by the state department, in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (3), shall be liable for the provision of the data to the state department nor for any use made thereof by the state department.
(3) (a) (I) Except as provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (a), or except as disclosure is otherwise required by statute or by rule of civil procedure for child support establishment or enforcement purposes, it is unlawful for any person to solicit, disclose, or make use of or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any lists or names of or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving public assistance and welfare directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state or county departments or subdivisions or agencies thereof or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties. No financial institution or insurance company that provides the data, whether confidential or not, required by the state department, in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (3), shall be liable for the provision of the data to the state department nor for any use made thereof by the state department.

The information described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) may be disclosed for purposes directly connected with the administration of public assistance and welfare and in accordance with this paragraph (a) and paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (3) and with the rules and regulations of the state department.

Notwithstanding any provision of state law to the contrary and to the extent allowable under federal law, at the request of the Colorado bureau of investigation, the state department shall provide the bureau with information concerning the location of any person whose name appears in the department's records who is the subject of an outstanding felony arrest warrant. Upon receipt of such information, it shall be the responsibility of the bureau to provide appropriate law enforcement agencies with location information obtained from the state department. Location information provided pursuant to this section shall be used solely for law enforcement purposes. The state department and the bureau shall determine and employ the most cost-effective method for obtaining and providing location information pursuant to this section. Neither the state department nor its employees or agents shall be liable in civil action for providing information in accordance with the provisions of this sub-subparagraph (A).

As used in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (III), "law enforcement agency" means any agency of the state or its political subdivisions that is responsible for enforcing the laws of this state. "Law enforcement agency" includes but is not limited to any police department, sheriff's department, district attorney's office, the office of the state attorney general, and the Colorado bureau of investigation.

By signing an application or redetermination of eligibility form for assistance or welfare, an applicant authorizes the state department to obtain records pertaining to information provided in that application or redetermination of eligibility form from a financial institution, as defined in section 15-15-201 (4), C.R.S., or from any insurance company. The application or redetermination of eligibility form shall contain language clearly indicating that signing constitutes such an authorization.

In order to determine if applicants for or recipients of public assistance have assets within eligibility limits, the state department of human services may provide a list of information identifying these applicants or recipients to any financial institution, as defined in section 15-15-201 (4), C.R.S., or to any insurance company. This information may include identification numbers or social security numbers. The state department of human services may require any such financial institution or insurance company to provide a written statement disclosing any assets held on behalf of individuals adequately identified on the list provided. Before a termination notice is sent to the recipient, the county department in verifying the accuracy of the information obtained as a result of the match shall contact the recipient and inform him or her of the apparent results of the computer match and give the recipient the opportunity to explain or correct any erroneous information secured by the match. The requirement to run a computerized match shall apply only to information that is entered in the financial institution's or insurance company's data processing system on the date the match is run and shall not be deemed to require any such institution or company to change its data or make new entries for the purpose of comparing identifying information. The cost of providing such computerized match shall be borne by the appropriate state department. The state department of human services shall not use the provisions of this subparagraph (I) for the information-gathering purposes of the financial institution data match system required by section 26-13-128.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1984, and thereafter, all funds expended by the state department to pay the cost of providing such computerized matches shall be subject to an annual appropriation by the general assembly.

The state department of human services may expend funds appropriated pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c) in an amount not to exceed the amount of annualized general fund savings that result from the termination of recipients from public assistance specifically due to disclosure of assets pursuant to this subsection (3).

The state department of human services shall make quarterly reports concerning the value of computerized matches pursuant to this paragraph (c) to the general assembly and the joint budget committee. Such reports shall include, but need not be limited to, the number of individuals against whom computer matches were run, the number of resulting matches, and the resulting public assistance case load reduction and corresponding savings to the state department.

No applicant shall be denied nor any recipient discontinued due to the disclosure of their assets unless and until the county department has assured that such assets taken together with other assets exceed the limit for eligibility of countable assets. Any information concerning assets found may be used to determine if such applicant's or recipient's eligibility for other public assistance is affected.

The applicant for or recipient of public assistance and welfare, or his representative, shall have an opportunity to examine all applications and pertinent records concerning said applicant or recipient which constitute a basis for denial, modification, or termination of such public assistance and welfare or to examine such records in case of a fair hearing.

Any person who violates subsection (1) or (3) of this section commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1169, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-13.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 888, § 1, effective July 28.

L. 77:

(2) repealed, p. 1337, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 79:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1082, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 1114, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 90:

(3)(b) and (3)(c)(I) amended, p. 921, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1), (3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(III), and (3)(c)(IV) amended, p. 1144, § 82, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 95:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1124, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(c)(I) amended, p. 767, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3)(a)(I) amended, p. 722, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(1), (3)(c), and (3)(d) amended, p. 1989, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (HB 15-1370), ch. 324, p. 1326, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3242, § 484, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1370, see section 1 of chapter 324, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.